Hawaii statutes.
§490:9‑809 Priority. This article
determines the priority of conflicting claims to collateral. However, if the
relative priorities of the claims were established before July 1, 2013, this article
as it existed before July 1, 2013, shall determine priority. [L 2012, c 33, pt
of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next